Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 53. Consumer Data Protection Act.
§ 59.1-579.
(Effective January 1, 2023) Responsibility according to role; controller and processor.

A processor shall adhere to the instructions of a controller and shall assist the controller in meeting its obligations under this chapter. Such assistance shall include:

Taking into account the nature of processing and the information available to the processor, by appropriate technical and organizational measures, insofar as this is reasonably practicable, to fulfill the controller’s obligation to respond to consumer
rights requests pursuant to § 59.1-577.

Taking into account the nature of processing and the information available to the processor, by assisting the controller in meeting the controller’s obligations in relation to the security of processing the personal data and in relation to the notification
of a breach of security of the system of the processor pursuant to §

18.2-186.6

in order to meet the controller’s obligations.

Providing necessary information to enable the controller to conduct and document data protection assessments pursuant to § 59.1-580.

A contract between a controller and a processor shall govern the processor’s data processing procedures with respect to processing performed on behalf of the controller. The contract shall be binding and clearly set forth instructions for processing data,
the nature and purpose of processing, the type of data subject to processing, the duration of processing, and the rights and obligations of both parties. The contract shall also include requirements that the processor shall:

Ensure that each person processing personal data is subject to a duty of confidentiality with respect to the data;

At the controller’s direction, delete or return all personal data to the controller as requested at the end of the provision of services, unless retention of the personal data is required by law;

Upon the reasonable request of the controller, make available to the controller all information in its possession necessary to demonstrate the processor’s compliance with the obligations in this chapter;

Allow, and cooperate with, reasonable assessments by the controller or the controller’s designated assessor; alternatively, the processor may arrange for a qualified and independent assessor to conduct an assessment of the processor’s policies and technical
and organizational measures in support of the obligations under this chapter using an appropriate and accepted control standard or framework and assessment procedure for such assessments. The processor shall provide a report
of such assessment to the controller upon request; and

Engage any subcontractor pursuant to a written contract in accordance with subsection C that requires the subcontractor to meet the obligations of the processor with respect to the personal data.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve a controller or a processor from the liabilities imposed on it by virtue of its role in the processing relationship as defined by this chapter.

Determining whether a person is acting as a controller or processor with respect to a specific processing of data is a fact-based determination that depends upon the context in which personal data is to be processed. A processor that continues to adhere
to a controller’s instructions with respect to a specific processing of personal data remains a processor.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35, 36.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2021 Sp. Sess. I act having been § 59.1-575.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first and third enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2023.”

§ 59.1-580.
(Effective January 1, 2023) Data protection assessments.

A controller shall conduct and document a data protection assessment of each of the following processing activities involving personal data:

The processing of personal data for purposes of targeted advertising;

The sale of personal data;

The processing of personal data for purposes of profiling, where such profiling presents a reasonably foreseeable risk of (i) unfair or deceptive treatment of, or unlawful disparate impact on, consumers; (ii) financial, physical, or reputational injury
to consumers; (iii) a physical or other intrusion upon the solitude or seclusion, or the private affairs or concerns, of consumers, where such intrusion would be offensive to a reasonable person; or (iv) other substantial
injury to consumers;

The processing of sensitive data; and

Any processing activities involving personal data that present a heightened risk of harm to consumers.

Data protection assessments conducted pursuant to subsection A shall identify and weigh the benefits that may flow, directly and indirectly, from the processing to the controller, the consumer, other stakeholders, and the public against the potential
risks to the rights of the consumer associated with such processing, as mitigated by safeguards that can be employed by the controller to reduce such risks. The use of de-identified data and the reasonable expectations of consumers,
as well as the context of the processing and the relationship between the controller and the consumer whose personal data will be processed, shall be factored into this assessment by the controller.

The Attorney General may request, pursuant to a civil investigative demand, that a controller disclose any data protection assessment that is relevant to an investigation conducted by the Attorney General, and the controller shall make the data protection
assessment available to the Attorney General. The Attorney General may evaluate the data protection assessment for compliance with the responsibilities set forth in § 59.1-578. Data protection assessments shall be confidential
and exempt from public inspection and copying under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.). The disclosure of a data protection assessment pursuant to a request from the Attorney General shall not constitute a waiver of attorney-client privilege or work product protection with respect to the assessment
and any information contained in the assessment.

A single data protection assessment may address a comparable set of processing operations that include similar activities.

Data protection assessments conducted by a controller for the purpose of compliance with other laws or regulations may comply under this section if the assessments have a reasonably comparable scope and effect.

Data protection assessment requirements shall apply to processing activities created or generated after January 1, 2023, and are not retroactive.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35, 36.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2021 Sp. Sess. I act having been § 59.1-576.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first and third enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2023.”

§ 59.1-581.
(Effective January 1, 2023) Processing de-identified data; exemptions.

The controller in possession of de-identified data shall:

Take reasonable measures to ensure that the data cannot be associated with a natural person;

Publicly commit to maintaining and using de-identified data without attempting to re-identify the data; and

Contractually obligate any recipients of the de-identified data to comply with all provisions of this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to (i) require a controller or processor to re-identify de-identified data or pseudonymous data or (ii) maintain data in identifiable form, or collect, obtain, retain, or access any data or technology, in order
to be capable of associating an authenticated consumer request with personal data.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a controller or processor to comply with an authenticated consumer rights request, pursuant to § 59.1-577, if all of the following are true:

The controller is not reasonably capable of associating the request with the personal data or it would be unreasonably burdensome for the controller to associate the request with the personal data;

The controller does not use the personal data to recognize or respond to the specific consumer who is the subject of the personal data, or associate the personal data with other personal data about the same specific consumer; and

The controller does not sell the personal data to any third party or otherwise voluntarily disclose the personal data to any third party other than a processor, except as otherwise permitted in this section.

The consumer rights contained in subdivisions A 1 through 4 of § 59.1-577 and § 59.1-578 shall not apply to pseudonymous data in cases where the controller is able to demonstrate any information necessary to identify the consumer is kept separately and
is subject to effective technical and organizational controls that prevent the controller from accessing such information.

A controller that discloses pseudonymous data or de-identified data shall exercise reasonable oversight to monitor compliance with any contractual commitments to which the pseudonymous data or de-identified data is subject and shall take appropriate steps
to address any breaches of those contractual commitments.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35, 36.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2021 Sp. Sess. I act having been § 59.1-577.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first and third enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2023.”

§ 59.1-582.
(Effective January 1, 2023) Limitations.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict a controller’s or processor’s ability to:

Comply with federal, state, or local laws, rules, or regulations;

Comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry, investigation, subpoena, or summons by federal, state, local, or other governmental authorities;

Cooperate with law-enforcement agencies concerning conduct or activity that the controller or processor reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal, state, or local laws, rules, or regulations;

Investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for, or defend legal claims;

Provide a product or service specifically requested by a consumer, perform a contract to which the consumer is a party, including fulfilling the terms of a written warranty, or take steps at the request of the consumer prior to entering into a contract;

Take immediate steps to protect an interest that is essential for the life or physical safety of the consumer or of another natural person, and where the processing cannot be manifestly based on another legal basis;

Prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to security incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, malicious or deceptive activities, or any illegal activity; preserve the integrity or security of systems; or investigate, report, or prosecute those
responsible for any such action;

Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific or statistical research in the public interest that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws and is approved, monitored, and governed by an institutional review board, or similar independent
oversight entities that determine: (i) if the deletion of the information is likely to provide substantial benefits that do not exclusively accrue to the controller; (ii) the expected benefits of the research outweigh the
privacy risks; and (iii) if the controller has implemented reasonable safeguards to mitigate privacy risks associated with research, including any risks associated with reidentification; or

Assist another controller, processor, or third party with any of the obligations under this subsection.

The obligations imposed on controllers or processors under this chapter shall not restrict a controller’s or processor’s ability to collect, use, or retain data to:

Conduct internal research to develop, improve, or repair products, services, or technology;

Effectuate a product recall;

Identify and repair technical errors that impair existing or intended functionality; or

Perform internal operations that are reasonably aligned with the expectations of the consumer or reasonably anticipated based on the consumer’s existing relationship with the controller or are otherwise compatible with processing data in furtherance of
the provision of a product or service specifically requested by a consumer or the performance of a contract to which the consumer is a party.

The obligations imposed on controllers or processors under this chapter shall not apply where compliance by the controller or processor with this chapter would violate an evidentiary privilege under the laws of the Commonwealth. Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to prevent a controller or processor from providing personal data concerning a consumer to a person covered by an evidentiary privilege under the laws of the Commonwealth as part of a privileged communication.

A controller or processor that discloses personal data to a third-party controller or processor, in compliance with the requirements of this chapter, is not in violation of this chapter if the third-party controller or processor that receives and processes
such personal data is in violation of this chapter, provided that, at the time of disclosing the personal data, the disclosing controller or processor did not have actual knowledge that the recipient intended to commit a violation.
A third-party controller or processor receiving personal data from a controller or processor in compliance with the requirements of this chapter is likewise not in violation of this chapter for the transgressions of the controller
or processor from which it receives such personal data.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as an obligation imposed on controllers and processors that adversely affects the rights or freedoms of any persons, such as exercising the right of free speech pursuant to the First Amendment to the United States
Constitution, or applies to the processing of personal data by a person in the course of a purely personal or household activity.

Personal data processed by a controller pursuant to this section shall not be processed for any purpose other than those expressly listed in this section unless otherwise allowed by this chapter. Personal data processed by a controller pursuant to this
section may be processed to the extent that such processing is:

Reasonably necessary and proportionate to the purposes listed in this section; and

Adequate, relevant, and limited to what is necessary in relation to the specific purposes listed in this section. Personal data collected, used, or retained pursuant to subsection B shall, where applicable, take into account the nature and purpose or
purposes of such collection, use, or retention. Such data shall be subject to reasonable administrative, technical, and physical measures to protect the confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility of the personal data
and to reduce reasonably foreseeable risks of harm to consumers relating to such collection, use, or retention of personal data.

If a controller processes personal data pursuant to an exemption in this section, the controller bears the burden of demonstrating that such processing qualifies for the exemption and complies with the requirements in subsection F.

Processing personal data for the purposes expressly identified in subdivisions A 1 through 9 shall not solely make an entity a controller with respect to such processing.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35, 36.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2021 Sp. Sess. I act having been § 59.1-578.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first and third enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2023.”

§ 59.1-583.
(Effective January 1, 2023) Investigative authority.

Whenever the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that any person has engaged in, is engaging in, or is about to engage in any violation of this chapter, the Attorney General is empowered to issue a civil investigative demand. The provisions
of § 59.1-9.10 shall apply mutatis mutandis to civil investigative demands issued under this section.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35, 36.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2021 Sp. Sess. I act having been § 59.1-579.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first and third enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2023.”

§ 59.1-584.
(Effective until January 1, 2023) Enforcement; civil penalty; expenses.

The Attorney General shall have exclusive authority to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

Prior to initiating any action under this chapter, the Attorney General shall provide a controller or processor 30 days’ written notice identifying the specific provisions of this chapter the Attorney General alleges have been or are being violated. If
within the 30-day period, the controller or processor cures the noticed violation and provides the Attorney General an express written statement that the alleged violations have been cured and that no further violations shall occur,
no action shall be initiated against the controller or processor.

If a controller or processor continues to violate this chapter following the cure period in subsection B or breaches an express written statement provided to the Attorney General under that subsection, the Attorney General may initiate an action in the
name of the Commonwealth and may seek an injunction to restrain any violations of this chapter and civil penalties of up to $7,500 for each violation under this chapter.

The Attorney General may recover reasonable expenses incurred in investigating and preparing the case, including attorney fees, in any action initiated under this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as providing the basis for, or be subject to, a private right of action for violations of this chapter or under any other law.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35, 36.

Section set out twice.

This section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the version of the section effective January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered 59.1-584.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2021 Sp. Sess. I act having been § 59.1-580.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first and third enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2023.”

§ 59.1-584.
(Effective January 1, 2023) Enforcement; civil penalty; expenses.

The Attorney General shall have exclusive authority to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

Prior to initiating any action under this chapter, the Attorney General shall provide a controller or processor 30 days’ written notice identifying the specific provisions of this chapter the Attorney General alleges have been or are being violated. If
within the 30-day period the controller or processor cures the noticed violation and provides the Attorney General an express written statement that the alleged violations have been cured and that no further violations shall occur,
no action shall be initiated against the controller or processor.

If a controller or processor continues to violate this chapter following the cure period in subsection B or breaches an express written statement provided to the Attorney General under that subsection, the Attorney General may initiate an action in the
name of the Commonwealth and may seek an injunction to restrain any violations of this chapter and civil penalties of up to $7,500 for each violation under this chapter. All civil penalties, expenses, and attorney fees collected
pursuant to this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Regulatory, Consumer Advocacy, Litigation, and Enforcement Revolving Trust Fund.

The Attorney General may recover reasonable expenses incurred in investigating and preparing the case, including attorney fees, in any action initiated under this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as providing the basis for, or be subject to, a private right of action for violations of this chapter or under any other law.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35, 36; 2022, cc. 451, 452.

Section set out twice.

This section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the version of the section effective until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered 59.1-584.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 451 and 452 are identical, and added the second sentence in subsection C.

§ 59.1-585.
Repealed by Acts 2022, cc. 451 and 452, cl. 2.

History.
2021, , Sp. Sess. I, c. 35; 2022, cc. 451, 452.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2021 Sp. Sess. I act having been § 59.1-581.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first and third enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2023.”